West Virginia, session 2026, HB4381.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 17. conferences and disaffiliations. §31E-17-1. Denominational Conferences. (a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a church may disaffiliate from its denominational conference and retain ownership of the property.(b) A disaffiliating local church shall reimburse its conference or denominations for the financial investments made by the conference or denomination for the acquisition, maintenance, and improvements to the real property used by the local church in accordance with subsections (c) of this section.(c) The conference or denomination shall provide a disaffiliating local church with a full and transparent accounting of all funds the conference or denomination has contributed for the acquisition and maintenance and improvement of the real property used by the local church from which the amount of the reimbursement required under subsection (b) shall be determined.(d) A disaffiliating local church shall not be required to reimburse the conference or denomination for any amounts attributable to financial investments for the acquisition, maintenance, or renovation of real property made by the local church.